Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2200.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Part II of Title 44 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 25ENFORCEMENT OF CIVIL IMMIGRATION LAWSec.2501. Scope of chapter.2502. Definitions.2503. Requirements . 2504. Identification procedures.§ 2501. Scope of chapter.123456789101112131415 This chapter relates to the enforcement of civil immigration law by State Police.§ 2502. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Administrative immigration warrant." A formal written document, which can be signed by an immigration judge or a Federal immigration authority, authorizing a law enforcement officer from a Federal immigration authority to make an arrest or a seizure of a foreign national for an alleged violation of immigration law."Administrative judge." As defined under 42 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions)."Federal immigration authority."(1) An officer, employee or person otherwise paid by or acting as an agent of the United States Department of Homeland Security, including, but not limited to:(i) The Department of Homeland Security's subagencies.(ii) United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement.(iii) United States Customs and Border Protection.(iv) Any current or future division of the Department of Homeland Security responsible for immigration enforcement.(2) The term shall include any officer, employee or person exercising Federal civil immigration authority under 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g) (relating to powers of immigration officers and employees) and those from other Federal agencies who have 20260HB2200PN2893 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 been deputized to perform immigration enforcement."Foreign national." An individual who is a citizen or national of any country other than the United States."Immigration detainer." A request or notification from a Federal immigration authority of intent to assume custody of an arrestee or detainee, which is usually accompanied by a request that the arresting agency or other custodian maintain custody of the arrestee or detainee for a period not to exceed 48 hours to facilitate transfer of the arrestee or detainee by a Federal immigration authority into Federal custody."Immigration enforcement." As follows:(1) An effort to investigate, enforce or assist in the investigation or enforcement of a Federal civil immigration law.(2) The term includes an effort to investigate, enforce or assist in the investigation or enforcement of a Federal criminal immigration law that penalizes a person's presence in, entry or reentry to or employment in the United States, including a violation of 8 U.S.C. §§ 1253 (relating to penalties related to removal), 1324c (relating to penalties for document fraud), 1325 (relating to improper entry by alien) and 1326 (relating to reentry of removed aliens)."Immigration judge." An administrative judge who has authority under 8 CFR 1240.41 (relating to immigration judges)."Immigration status." An individual's status with respect to Federal immigration law, nationality or citizenship, including information that an individual:(1) has previously been deported or removed;(2) is sought by a Federal immigration authority for deportation or removal; or20260HB2200PN2893 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) otherwise appears to be deportable or removable."State Police." The Pennsylvania State Police.§ 2503. Requirements.State Police personnel shall abide by the following requirements:(1) State Police personnel may not stop, search, investigate or attempt to detain or arrest an individual based upon the individual's immigration status or the suspicion, knowledge or evidence of an administrative immigration warrant or immigration detainer.(2) State Police personnel are prohibited from questioning an individual regarding the individual's immigration status, unless the individual's immigration status is necessary to further an ongoing criminal investigation that is unrelated to immigration enforcement.(3) An interaction with or detention of an individual may not be prolonged based solely upon the individual's immigration status or the suspicion, knowledge or evidence of an administrative immigration warrant or immigration detainer.(4) State Police personnel are prohibited from conducting or requesting an immigration alien query on an individual who is not already under arrest for a matter that is unrelated to immigration enforcement.(5) If it is discovered that an individual is the subject of an administrative immigration warrant or immigration detainer, State Police personnel may communicate with, report to or otherwise share relevant information with the appropriate Federal immigration authority. If State Police personnel elect to communicate information to a 20260HB2200PN2893 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Federal immigration authority, the communication shall not be initiated until the State Police personnel's interaction with the individual has concluded and the individual has been released from investigatory detention or arrest processing has been completed. The communication may not be the basis to detain or prolong the detention of the individual.(6) If during an encounter with an individual there is determined to be a language barrier to communication, State Police personnel may not contact or utilize a Federal immigration authority for language interpretation services.§ 2504. Identification procedures.(a) When operator of vehicle arrested or detained.--When an individual, including a foreign national, is the operator of a motor vehicle and is arrested or detained by an officer of the State Police:(1) A driver's license issued by the Commonwealth, another state or the individual's country of origin shall be sufficient to identify the individual.(2) If the individual is not in possession of a driver's license, the officer shall ask for the individual's full name, date of birth and any governmental or nongovernmental form of identification.(3) Only if the individual cannot be properly identified under paragraph (1) or (2) may State Police personnel utilize fingerprinting procedures to determine the existence of identifying information.(b) When a passenger, victim or witness.--The following shall apply when an individual, including a foreign national, is a passenger, victim or witness:(1) State Police personnel may not ask for an 20260HB2200PN2893 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 individual's identification on the basis of determining the individual's immigration status.(2) State Police personnel may not question or detain an individual for questioning regarding the immigration status of the individual or another person.(3) (i) On occasions when, consistent with applicable law, it is necessary for State Police personnel to ask a victim, witness or passenger for identification, State Police personnel shall accept any of the following as proof of the individual's identity:(A) a passport issued by the United States or another country; or(B) a driver's license issued by the Commonwealth, another state or another country.(ii) State Police personnel shall not complete a Driver's License Query or Query Wanted Person Files via the Commonwealth Law Enforcement Assistance Network (CLEAN) for a passenger, victim or witness unless there is a reasonable and articulable suspicion of criminal activity or the passenger has volunteered to assume operation of the vehicle and the State Police personnel needs to confirm the passenger's licensure to operate the vehicle.Section 2. Title 44 is amended by adding a part to read:PART VPROHIBITED USE OF FUNDSChapter91. Federal Immigration EnforcementCHAPTER 91FEDERAL IMMIGRATION ENFORCEMENT20260HB2200PN2893 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Sec.9101. Scope of chapter.9102. Definitions.9103. Prohibited law enforcement agency agreements.9104. Prohibited use of funds by law enforcement.9105. Reporting requirements.9106. Construction . § 9101. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to the use of State appropriated money allocated to law enforcement agencies participating in a Federal immigration enforcement agreement.§ 9102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Federal immigration authority."(1) An officer, employee or person otherwise paid by or acting as an agent of the United States Department of Homeland Security, including, but not limited to:(i) The Department of Homeland Security's subagencies.(ii) United States Immigration and Customs Enforcement.(iii) United States Customs and Border Protection.(iv) Any current or future division of the Department of Homeland Security responsible for immigration enforcement.(2) The term shall include any officer, employee or person exercising Federal civil immigration authority under 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g) (relating to powers of immigration officers 20260HB2200PN2893 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and employees) and those from other Federal agencies who have been deputized to perform immigration enforcement."Hold request." A Federal immigration authority request that a local law enforcement agency maintain custody of an individual currently in the local law enforcement agency's custody beyond the time the individual would otherwise be eligible for release in order to facilitate transfer to Federal immigration authorities, including through an immigration detainer."Law enforcement agency." As defined under section 7302 (relating to definitions)."Law enforcement officer." The term shall have the same meaning as the term "peace officer" under 18 Pa.C.S. § 501 (relating to definitions)."Restricted personal information." As defined under 18 Pa.C.S. § 2719 (relating to endangerment of public safety official).§ 9103. Prohibited law enforcement agency agreements.(a) Prohibitions.--A law enforcement agency may not enter into, modify, renew or extend an agreement to:(1) exercise Federal civil immigration authority under 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g) (relating to powers of immigration officers and employees); or(2) detain or house individuals who are in the custody of a Federal immigration authority for violations of Federal immigration law.(b) Termination.--Any of the following with an existing immigration enforcement agreement must terminate the agreement within 30 days after the effective date of this subsection:(1) State agency.(2) Unit of local government.20260HB2200PN2893 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Law enforcement agency.§ 9104. Prohibited use of funds by law enforcement.A law enforcement agency may not use State appropriated money or resources to:(1) Investigate, interrogate, detain, detect, house or arrest an individual for immigration enforcement purposes, including:(i) inquiring into an individual's immigration status;(ii) detaining an individual on the basis of a hold request;(iii) providing information regarding an individual's release date or restricted personal information;(iv) making or intentionally participating in arrests based on civil immigration warrants;(v) assisting immigration authorities in the activities described in 8 U.S.C. § 1357(a)(3) (relating to powers of immigration officers and employees);(vi) exercising Federal civil immigration authority under 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g); or(vii) any other activity not specifically listed under this paragraph but the purpose of which is to support, assist or conduct Federal immigration enforcement.(2) Place a law enforcement officer under the supervision of a Federal agency or employ a law enforcement officer deputized as a special Federal officer or special Federal deputy for the purpose of Federal immigration enforcement.20260HB2200PN2893 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Use immigration officers or agents as interpreters for law enforcement matters relating to individuals in agency or department custody.(4) Transfer an individual to a Federal immigration authority unless authorized by a judicial warrant or a judicial probable cause determination.(5) Provide office space for Federal immigration authorities for use within a city or county law enforcement facility.§ 9105. Reporting requirements.(a) Report.--A law enforcement agency with an agreement to exercise Federal civil immigration authority under 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g) (relating to powers of immigration officers and employees) shall submit a report every month to the Attorney General, which shall include the following information:(1) Total cost of all activities listed under section 9104 (relating to prohibited use of funds by law enforcement).(2) Amount of time spent by law enforcement officers performing the activities.(3) The source of funding for:(i) wages paid to law enforcement officers performing activities; and(ii) equipment, vehicles and any other resources used for the activities that were performed.(b) Additional requirements.--Each report provided to the Attorney General under subsection (a) shall be sufficiently detailed to provide transparency that money used to exercise Federal civil immigration authority under 8 U.S.C. § 1357(g) was not appropriated to the law enforcement agency by the 20260HB2200PN2893 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Commonwealth.(c) Transparency requirements.--Each report provided to the Attorney General under subsection (a) shall contain the:(1) purpose of the task force;(2) total number of arrests made during the reporting period;(3) number of people arrested for immigration enforcement purposes; and(4) number of hold requests, including if the number is zero, received by the law enforcement agency, which shall include the following information for each hold request:(i) the date when the hold request was received;(ii) the date and time the individual subject to the hold request posted criminal bail, if applicable;(iii) whether the individual subject to the hold request was released or transferred; and(iv) if the individual was released or transferred:(A) the date and time of the release or transfer; and(B) the name of the law enforcement or government agency to which custody of the individual was transferred.(d) Exempt information.--A report provided to the Attorney General under this section shall not contain the names or other personally identifying information of any individual subject to a hold request.(e) Attorney General reporting requirements.--The Attorney General shall post each report received under subsection (a) on the Attorney General's publicly accessible Internet website.§ 9106. Construction.20260HB2200PN2893 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to:(1) limit a law enforcement agency from enforcing any valid court-issued warrant or order;(2) prohibit a law enforcement agency from complying with other Federal statutory or regulatory requirements regarding disclosure of criminal history record information under 28 CFR Pt. 20 (relating to criminal justice information systems); or(3) prohibit a law enforcement agency from applying for or receiving reimbursement from the Federal Government for time spent enforcing Federal civil immigration laws.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 30 days.20260HB2200PN2893 - 12 - 123456789101112